Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 42. Oil, Gas, and Mining Leases

38-42-101.
Lease with option to purchase, title requirements.

Every oil and gas or mining lease containing any provision whereby the lessor grants and sells to the lessee therein a right or option, at any time during the term thereof or any extensions or renewals thereof, to purchase any part of the lessor’s mineral or royalty interest in, on, or under the leased premises shall clearly state in the heading or title of the lease that such right or option is contained therein; but the customary provision contained in such leases permitting the lessee to purchase or sell the lessor’s share of production and to account to lessor for the proceeds thereof shall not be deemed to be such a right or option.

History.

Source:
L. 55:

P. 724, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-13-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-13-1.

38-42-102.
Option void, when.

Any such right or option contained in any oil and gas or mining lease which is executed subsequent to March 2, 1955, and the title or heading of which does not clearly state that such a right or option is contained therein shall be voidable at the option of the lessor, and upon adjudication by a court of competent jurisdiction that such right or option is voided by virtue of this article, no money paid to the lessor for such lease shall be returned to the lessee therein, but the failure of such lease to satisfy the requirements of this article shall not affect the validity of such lease except as to such right or option to purchase.

History.

Source:
L. 55:

P. 724, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 118-13-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-13-2.

38-42-103.
Title form.

The title or heading of such a lease containing such a right or option in the lessee as set forth in this article shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this article if it reads substantially as follows: Oil and gas lease with option to purchase, or mining lease with option to purchase.

History.

Source:
L. 55:

P. 725, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 118-13-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-13-3.

38-42-104.
Lease surrendered, when.

When any oil, gas, or other mineral lease given on land situated in any county of Colorado and recorded therein becomes forfeited or expires by its own terms, it is the duty of the lessee, his successors, or assigns, within ninety days from April 30, 1957, if the forfeiture or expiration occurred prior thereto and within ninety days after the date of the forfeiture or expiration of any other lease, to have such lease surrendered in writing, such surrender to be signed by the party making the same, acknowledged, and placed on record in the county where the leased land is situated without cost to the owner of the leased premises.

History.

Source:
L. 57:

P. 618, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-13-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-13-4.

38-42-105.
Actions for surrender of lease - damages.

If the owner of such lease neglects or refuses to execute a release as provided by section 38-42-104, then the owner of the leased premises may sue in any court of competent jurisdiction to obtain such release, and he may also recover in such action from the lessee, his successors, or assigns the sum of one hundred dollars as damages and all costs, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee for preparing and prosecuting the suit, and he may also recover any additional damages that the evidence in the case warrants. In all such actions, writs of attachment may issue as in other cases if the owner of the leased premises makes demand for release in writing, by certified or registered mail, sent to the last-known address of the lessee, successor, or assignee, as the case may be, at least thirty days prior to instituting an action under this section.

History.

Source:
L. 57:

P. 618, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 118-13-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-13-5.

38-42-106.
Record of lease no longer notice unless affidavit recorded.

The lessee of any oil, gas, or other mineral lease given on or after March 28, 1967, on land situated in this state or any owner of a partial interest in such lease shall, prior to the expiration of six months after the expiration of the primary or definite term set forth in the lease, record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein such land is situate an affidavit if the affiant claims an extension of the term of the lease beyond the primary or definite term thereof. If no such affidavit is recorded, then six months after the expiration of the primary or definite term of such lease, the record thereof, if any, shall cease to be notice and shall have no more effect than an unrecorded instrument.

The lessee of any oil, gas, or other mineral lease given prior to March 28, 1967, on land situated in this state or any owner of a partial interest in such lease shall, within six years after March 28, 1967, or prior to the expiration of six months after the expiration of the primary or definite term set forth in the lease, whichever is later, record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein such land is situate an affidavit if the affiant claims an extension of the term of the lease beyond the primary or definite term thereof. If such affidavit is not so recorded, then after the expiration of such six-year period, or six months after the expiration of the primary or definite term set forth in the lease, whichever is later, the record of such lease, if any, shall cease to be notice and shall have no more effect than an unrecorded instrument.

History.

Source:
L. 67:

P. 160, § 1;

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-13-6.